Maine, session 132, LD193.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 20-A MRSA §15675, sub-§4 is enacted to read:
4. Students experiencing homelessness. For each student experiencing
homelessness, a school administrative unit receives an additional weight of .50 per student.
For the purposes of this subsection, "student experiencing homelessness" means a student
who has been identified by a school administrative unit as a homeless child or youth as
defined in the federal McKinney-Vento Homeless Assistance Act, 42 United States Code,
Section 11434a.
Sec. 2. 20-A MRSA §15683, sub-§1, ¶A, as amended by PL 2021, c. 428, §9, is
further amended to read:
A. The product of the school administrative unit's kindergarten to grade 8 EPS per-
pupil rate multiplied by the total of the kindergarten to grade 8 portions of the following
pupil counts:
(1) The pupil count set forth in section 15674, subsection 1, paragraph C or D,
whichever is applicable;
(2) The additional weight for English learners calculated pursuant to section
15675, subsection 1; and
(3) The additional weight for economically disadvantaged students calculated
pursuant to section 15675, subsection 2; and
(4) The additional weight for students experiencing homelessness calculated
pursuant to section 15675, subsection 4;
Sec. 3. 20-A MRSA §15683, sub-§1, ¶B, as amended by PL 2019, c. 398, §33, is
further amended to read:
B. The product of the school administrative unit's grade 9 to 12 EPS per-pupil rate
multiplied by the total of the grade 9 to 12 portion of the following pupil counts:
(1) The pupil count set forth in section 15674, subsection 1, paragraphs A, B and
C;
(2) The additional weight for English learners calculated pursuant to section
15675, subsection 1; and
(3) The additional weight for economically disadvantaged students calculated
pursuant to section 15675, subsection 2; and
(4) The additional weight for students experiencing homelessness calculated
pursuant to section 15675, subsection 4;